Georgia, session 2025_26, HB335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the "Quality
Basic Education Act," is amended in Part 15, relating to miscellaneous provisions, by adding
a new Code section to read as follows:
"20-2-324.8.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
H. B. 335
- 1 -

LC 49 2115
(1) 'Athletic association' means any association of schools or any other similar
organization which acts as an organizing, sanctioning, scheduling, or rule-making body
for interscholastic athletic activities in which public schools and participating private
schools in this state participate.
(2) 'Healthcare provider' means a licensed physician, another licensed individual under
the supervision of a licensed physician, licensed psychiatrist, licensed psychologist,
licensed clinical social worker, licensed professional counselor, clinical nurse specialist
in psychiatric/mental health, or other licensed mental or behavioral health clinician or
specialist who has received training on screening school age children for mental health
risks.
(3) 'Interscholastic athletic activity' means interscholastic athletics and practices and
scrimmages related to interscholastic athletics.
(4) 'Participating private school' means a private school in this state whose students or
teams compete against students or teams from a public school or local school system in
this state.
(5) 'Student athlete' means a public school or participating private school student in
grades six through 12 participating in or desiring to participate in an interscholastic
athletic activity.
(b) Each athletic association shall, in consultation with the Department of Behavioral
Health and Developmental Disabilities, develop and post on its public website guidelines
and other relevant materials, including, but not limited to, approved videos or links thereto,
to inform and educate student athletes, their parents or guardians, school personnel, and
coaches about mental health risks for student athletes and raising awareness of mental
health resources available to student athletes. In developing such guidelines and materials,
an athletic association may utilize educational videos available at no cost to the state for
the purpose of educating school personnel and coaches.
H. B. 335
- 2 -

LC 49 2115
(c) Each public school and participating private school which includes one or more grades
from grades six through 12 shall provide information to each student athlete's parent or
guardian at least once each school year regarding mental health risks for student athletes
and to raise awareness of mental health resources available to student athletes.
(d)(1) Once each school year, each coach of an interscholastic athletic activity shall
review the guidelines and other relevant materials, including, but not limited to, videos,
approved by each athletic association of which the coach's school is a member pursuant
to subsection (b) of this Code section.
(2) A coach shall not be eligible to coach an interscholastic athletic activity until he or
she completes the requirements contained in this subsection.
(e) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to create any liability for, or create a
cause of action against, a local board of education or other governing body of a public
school or participating private school, or an athletic association, or the officers, employees,
or volunteers of any such entities for any act or omission related to the removal or
nonremoval of a student athlete participating in an interscholastic athletic activity in
conjunction with an actual or perceived risk to the mental health of such student athlete or
another student athlete; provided, however, that this subsection shall not include healthcare
providers unless they are acting in a volunteer capacity.
(f) The sponsors of youth athletic activities, as defined in subsection (a) of Code Section
20-2-324.1, are encouraged to implement the provisions of this Code section."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 335
- 3 -